Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2998
Derivative action.

A member may maintain a derivative action to enforce a right of a limited cooperative association if the member adequately represents the interests of the limited cooperative association and if:

(1) The member first makes a demand on the limited cooperative association, requesting that it bring an action to enforce the right, and the limited cooperative association does not bring the action within a reasonable time; and

(2) Ninety days have expired after the date the demand was made unless the member has earlier been notified that the demand has been rejected by the limited cooperative association or unless irreparable injury to the limited cooperative association would result by waiting for the expiration of the time.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 98.